sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Komponente za nadzor avtomatskih sistemov > Programirljivi logični krmilniki: Moduli za nadzor avtomatskih sistemov; Krmilniki sistema za upravljanje stavb (BMS); Krmilniki za digitalni naslovljivi vmesnik za razsvetljavo (DALI); Krmilniki motorjev; Zaganjalniki motorja
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 자동 제어 기기 > 프로그램 가능 로직 컨트롤러: 자동화 제어 모듈; 건물 관리 시스템(BMS) 컨트롤러; DALI(디지털 주소 지정 조명 인터페이스) 컨트롤러; 모터 컨트롤러; 모터 스타터
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Automatikos valdymo komponentai > Programuojamieji loginiai valdikliai: Automatikos valdymo moduliai; Pastatų valdymo sistemų (BMS) valdikliai; Skaitmeninės adresuojamos apšvietimo sąsajos (DALI) valdikliai; Variklių valdikliai; Variklių starteriai
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 自动化控制组件 > 可编程序控制器: 自动化控制模块; 楼宇管理系统 (BMS) 控制器; 数字可寻址照明接口 (DALI) 控制器; 电机控制器; 电机启动器
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Automatisierungskomponenten > Speicherprogrammierbare Steuerungen: Automatisierungssteuerungsmodule; Steuerungen für Gebäudemanagementsysteme (BMS); DALI-Lichtsteuerungen (Digital Addressable Lighting Interface); Motorsteuerungen; Motorstarter
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 自動制御部品 > プログラマブルロジックコントローラ: 自動化制御モジュール; ビル管理システム（BMS）コントローラー; 照明制御システム (DALI) コントローラー; モーターコントローラー; モータースターター
nb: Forretninger og industri > Komponenter for automasjonskontroll > Programmerbare logikkontrollere: Moduler for automasjonskontroll; BMS-kontrollere (Building Management System); DALI-kontrollere (Diital Addressable Lighting Interface); Motorkontrollere; Motorstartere
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Componentes de controlo de automatização > Controladores de lógica programáveis: Módulos de controlo de automatização; Controladores de gestão técnica centralizada; Controladores de interface de iluminação endereçável digital; Controladores de motor; Arrancadores de motor
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > ส่วนประกอบควบคุมระบบอัตโนมัติ > เครื่องควบคุมตรรกะแบบโปรแกรม: โมดูลควบคุมระบบอัตโนมัติ; ตัวควบคุมระบบการจัดการอาคาร (BMS); ตัวควบคุมอินเทอร์เฟซไฟส่องสว่างแบบระบุตำแหน่งได้แบบดิจิตอล (DALI); อุปกรณ์ควบคุมมอเตอร์; มอเตอร์สตาร์ทเตอร์
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Компоненты автоматизированных систем управления > Программируемые логические контроллеры: Модули управления; Контроллеры системы диспетчеризации зданий (BMS); Контроллеры цифрового адресного интерфейса освещения (DALI); Контроллеры двигателей; Пусковые устройства двигателей
en: Business & Industrial > Automation Control Components > Programmable Logic Controllers: Automation Control Modules; Building Management System (BMS) Controllers; Digital Addressable Lighting Interface (DALI) Controllers; Motor Controllers; Motor Starters
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Komponenty automatyki przemysłowej > Sterowniki PLC: Moduły automatyki; Sterowniki systemu zarządzania budynkiem (BMS).; Sterowniki cyfrowego systemu sterowania oświetleniem (DALI); Sterowniki silników; Rozruszniki silników
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Componente de control al automatizării > Controlere logice programabile: Module de control al automatizării; Controlere pentru sistemul de management al clădirilor (BMS); Controlere DALI (Digital Addressable Lighting Interface); Controlere pentru motoare; Demaroare pentru motoare
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 自動化控制元件 > 可程式邏輯控制器: 自動化控制模組; 建築物管理系統 (BMS) 控制器; 數位定址燈光通訊介面 (DALI) 控制器; 馬達控制器; 馬達啟動開關
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Součásti pro automatické řízení > Programovatelné logické automaty (PLC): Moduly pro automatické řízení; Regulátory BMS (Building Management System); Regulátory DALI (Digital Addressable Lighting Interface); Řídicí jednotky motorů; Startéry
sv: Företag och industri > Delar för automatiseringsstyrning > Programmerbara styrsystem: Automationskontrollmoduler; Styrsystem för byggnadsledningssystem (BMS).; Digitala adresserbara belysningsgränssnittskontroller (DALI); Motorstyrenheter; Motorstartare
es: Economía e industria > Componentes de control de automatización > Controladores lógicos programables: Módulos de control de automatización; Controladores del sistema de gestión de edificios (BMS); Controladores de interfaz de iluminación direccionable digital (DALI); Controladores de motores; Arrancadores de motores
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Automaatio-ohjauksen komponentit > Ohjelmoitava logiikka: Automaation hallintamoduulit; Kiinteistönhallintajärjestelmän ohjaimet; Digitaaliset valaistuksen DALI-ohjaimet; Moottoriohjaimet; Moottorikäynnistimet
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Komponenty riadenia automatizácie > Programovateľné logické ovládače: Moduly riadenia automatizácie; Ovládače systému riadenia budov (BMS); Ovládače rozhrania pre digitálne adresné riadenie osvetlenia (DALI); Ovládače motora; Štartéry motora
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Εξαρτήματα ελέγχου αυτοματισμού > Προγραμματιζόμενοι λογικοί ελεγκτές: Μονάδες ελέγχου αυτοματισμού; Ελεγκτές συστήματος διαχείρισης κτιρίων (BMS); Ελεγκτές ψηφιακής διευθυνσιοδοτούμενης διεπαφής φωτισμού (DALI); Ελεγκτές κινητήρα; Εκκινητές κινητήρων
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Komponente upravljanja automatizacijom > Programabilni logički kontroleri: Moduli upravljanja automatizacijom; Kontroleri sustava upravljanja zgradom (BMS); Kontroleri sučelja digitalne adresabilne rasvjete (DALI).; Kontroleri motora; Pokretači motora
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Otomasyon Denetim Bileşenleri > Programlanabilir Mantık Denetleyicileri: Otomasyon Kontrol Modülleri; Bina Yönetim Sistemi (BMS) Kontrolörleri; Dijital Adreslenebilir Aydınlatma Arayüzü (DALI) Kontrol Cihazları; Motor Kontrol Cihazları; Motor Yolvericiler
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Componentes de controle de automação > Controladores lógicos programáveis: Módulos de controle de automação; Controladores de sistema de gestão predial (BMS); Controladores de interface de iluminação endereçável digital (DALI); Controladores de motor; Motores de partidas
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Componenten voor automatische bediening > Programmeerbare logische controllers (PLC's): Modules voor automatische bediening; Controllers voor gebouwbeheersysteem (GBS); Controllers voor digitaal adresseerbare verlichtingsinterface (DALI); Motorregelaars; Motorstarters
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Composants d’automatisation > Automates programmables industriels: Modules de contrôle d’automatisation; Contrôleurs de gestion technique de bâtiment (BMS); Contrôleurs d’interface de protocole Dali; Contrôleurs de moteur; Démarreurs de moteur
it: Commercio e industria > Componenti di controllo dell'automazione > Controller logici programmabili: Moduli di controllo dell'automazione; Controller del sistema di gestione degli edifici (BMS); Controller DALI (Digital Addressable Lighting Interface); Controller per motori; Avviatori motore
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Automatizálási vezérlőkomponensek > Programozható logikai vezérlők: Automatizálási vezérlőmodulok; Épületfelügyeleti rendszer (BMS) vezérlők; Digitális címezhető világítási interfész (DALI) vezérlők; Motorvezérlők; Motorindítók
da: Erhverv og industri > Komponenter til automatiseringskontrol > Programmerbare logikcontrollere: Automationskontrolmoduler; BMS-controllere (Building Management System); DALI-controllere (Digital Addressable Lighting Interface); Motorstyringer; Motorstartere
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Компоненти за автоматизирано управление > Програмируеми логически контролери: Модули за управление на автоматизацията; Контролери за системи за управление на сгради (BMS); Контролери за интерфейс за цифрово адресируемо осветление (DALI); Моторни контролери; Моторни стартери
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Linh kiện điều khiển tự động hóa > Bộ điều khiển logic có thể lập trình: Mô-đun điều khiển tự động hóa; Bộ điều khiển hệ thống quản lý tòa nhà (BMS); Bộ điều khiển giao thức chiếu sáng theo địa chỉ thông qua tín hiệu kỹ thuật số (DALI); Bộ điều khiển động cơ; Bộ khởi động động cơ